Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-225 Form of adjusters' license.
Adjusters' licenses shall be in such form as the commissioner prescribes. The
licenses shall contain:

(1) The name of the adjuster, and the address of the
adjuster's place of business;

(2) A statement as to whether the adjuster is so
licensed as an independent adjuster or as a public adjuster;

(3) Date of issuance of the license; and

(4) Other statements proper to the purposes of the
license. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next